Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-432
Infraction; person alleged to have committed; custody; when.

Any peace officer may take a person alleged to have committed an infraction into custody if harm is likely to occur to either the individual or society if such person is not taken into custody.

Laws 1978, LB 808, § 3.